pt-BR: Tipo de configuração da roda: Anti-rocker; Roda grande; Plano; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Três rodas; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Outro
nb: Type oppsett for hjul: Anti-rocker; Stort hjul; Flat; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Tre hjul; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Annet
ru: Тип конфигурации колес: Антирокеринг; Большие колеса; Флэт; Полный рокеринг; Hi-Lo (разноколесные); Трехколесные; Три-рокеринг; Wizard-рокеринг; Другое
de: Art des Rollenaufbaus: Anti-Rocker; Big Wheel; Flat; Full Rocker; Hi-Lo; 3-Rollen; Tri-Rocker; Wizard; Andere
en: Wheel setup type: Anti-rocker; Big wheel; Flat; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Three-wheel; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Other
zh-CN: 轮组配置类型: 极限轮配置 (Anti-rocker); 大轮; 平轮; 全摇摆配置 (Full rocker); 高低轮 (Hi-lo); 三轮; 三轮摇摆 (Tri-rocker); 巫师配置 (Wizard); 其他
lt-LT: Rato sąrankos tipas: „Anti-rocker“; Didelių ratų; Plokščias; Pilnas „rocker“; „Hi-Lo“; Trijų ratų; „Tri-rocker“; „Wizard“; Kita
es: Tipo de configuración de rueda: Antirrocker; Rueda grande; Plana; Rocker completo; Hi-lo; Tres ruedas; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de configurație a roților: Anti-rocker; Roată mare; Plat; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Cu trei roți; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta postavitve koles: Anti-rocker; Velika kolesa; Ravna; Popoln rocker; Hi-lo; Trikolesna; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Drugo
ko: 휠 설치 유형: 안티 로커; 빅 휠; 플랫; 풀 로커; 하이로우; 3륜; 트라이 로커; 위저드; 기타
ja: ホイール設定タイプ: アンチロッカー; ビッグウィール; フラット; フルロッカー; Hi-Lo; 3輪; トリロッカー; ウィザード; その他
it: Tipo di configurazione della ruota: Anti-rocker; A ruote grandi; Flat; Full rocker; Hi-Lo; A tre ruote; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Altro
fr: Type de configuration des roues: Anti-rocker; Grandes roues; Plat; Full rocker; Hi-Lo; Trois roues; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Autre
fi: Pyöräkokoonpanon tyyppi: Anti-rocker; Iso rengas; Tasainen; Täysi rocker; Hi-lo; Kolmipyöräinen; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Muu
sv: Typ av hjuluppsättning: Antirocker; Stort hjul; Platt; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Tre hjul; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ nastavenia kolesa: Anti-rocker; Veľké koleso; Plochý; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Trojkolesový; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Iné
el: Τύπος διάταξης τροχών: Anti-rocker; Μεγάλος τροχός; Επίπεδο; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Με 3 τροχούς; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Άλλο
nl: Type wielconfiguratie: Anti-rocker; Big wheel; Flat; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Driewieler; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Overig
da: Hjulopsætning: Anti-rocker; Stort hjul; Flad; Full-rocker; Hi-lo; Trehjulet; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Andet
bg-BG: Тип конфигурация на колелата: Анти-рокер (Anti-rocker); Голямо колело; Плосък (Flat); Пълен рокер (Full rocker); Hi-lo; Три колела; Три-рокер (Tri-rocker); Уизърд (Wizard); Друго
pl: Typ konfiguracji kół: Anti-rocker; Duże koła; Płaskie; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Trzykołowe; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Inne
tr: Tekerlek kurulum tipi: Anti-rocker; Büyük tekerlek; Düz; Tam rocker; Hi-lo; Üç tekerlekli; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Diğer
vi: Kiểu thiết lập bánh xe: Anti-rocker; Bánh lớn; Bằng phẳng; Cánh cung hoàn toàn; Hi-lo; Ba bánh; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Khác
zh-TW: 車輪設置類型: 反香蕉配置; 大輪配置; 平輪配置; 全香蕉配置; Hi-Lo 配置; 三輪配置; 三輪香蕉配置; Wizard 配置; 其他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งล้อ: แอนตี้ร็อกเกอร์; ล้อใหญ่; แบน; ฟูลร็อกเกอร์; ไฮ-โลว์; สามล้อ; ไตร-ร็อกเกอร์; วิซาร์ด; อื่นๆ
hu: Kerék beállítási típusa: Anti-rocker; Nagykerék; Lapos; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Háromkerekű; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de configuração da roda: Anti-rocker; Roda grande; Plano; Full rocker; Hi-lo; Três rodas; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Outro
cs: Typ sestavení kola: Anti-rocker; Velká kola; Flat (ploché); Full rocker; Hi-lo; Tříkolové; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta postave kotača: Anti-rocker; Veliki kotač; Ravno; Potpuni rocker; Hi-lo; S tri kotača; Tri-rocker; Wizard; Ostalo